New Mexico, session 2026, HB300.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION.--Three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000) is appropriated from the general fund to the department of finance and administration for the northwest New Mexico council of governments for expenditure in fiscal years 2027 through 2029 for the care and management of free-roaming and domestic horses on tribal land located in Cibola county, to include creating and implementing a herd management plan; treating mares with fertility control vaccines; humanely relocating up to sixty excess free-roaming horses; and holding veterinary clinics to treat domestic horses, including gelding and vaccinations. Any unexpended balance remaining at the end of fiscal year 2029 shall revert to the general fund. - 2 -